Alabama, session 2026rs, HB8.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
term "public school" means any public K-12 school or public
charter school.
(b)(1) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each
local board of education and the governing body of each public
charter school may take a recorded vote on whether to adopt a
policy authorizing a public school under its jurisdiction to
accept a campus chaplain as a volunteer under this section.
(2) If a local board of education or the governing body
of a public charter school votes to accept a campus chaplain
as a volunteer, a campus chaplain may be made available to
provide support, services, and programs at the request of any
teacher in the local school district.
(c)(1) A campus chaplain volunteering under this
section is not required to be certified by the State Board of
Education.
(2) Each campus chaplain volunteering under this
Page 1

(2) Each campus chaplain volunteering under this
HB8 Enrolled
section must have completed a recognized chaplain training
program.
(d) A public school that accepts a campus chaplain as a
volunteer under this section, before the campus chaplain may
begin volunteering, shall ensure that the campus chaplain
complies with Section 16-22A-5, Code of Alabama 1975, relating
to criminal history background information check requirements.
(e) A public school may not accept a campus chaplain as
a volunteer who has been adjudicated or convicted of an
offense that requires registration as a sex offender under
Chapter 20A of Title 15, Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on July 1,
2026.
Page 2

2026.
HB8 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 24-Feb-26, as amended.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 07-Apr-26 Passed



Page 3